New York, session 2025-2026, A4453.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 4 of section 1124 of the education law, as 2 amended by section 28 of part B of chapter 57 of the laws of 2008, is 3 amended to read as follows: 4 4. Additional service centers shall be located in the cities of 5 Niagara Falls, Olean, Troy, Amsterdam, Newburgh, Corning, Ithaca, Cort- 6 land, Auburn, Watertown, Plattsburgh, Batavia, Massena and Glens Falls, 7 the counties of Delaware, Ontario and Rockland, the county of Orange, in 8 either the city of Middletown or Port Jervis or in the town of Deerpark, 9 Greenville, Mount Hope, Warwick or Wawayanda or in the village of Gosh- 10 en, in the county of New York to serve the Harlem community, and in the 11 counties of Putnam, Sullivan and Herkimer. 12 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of April next succeeding 13 the date on which it shall have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05958-01-5